Illinois, session 104th, HB3340.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Division 5.2 to Article 18 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 18 Div 5.2 heading new)7Division 5.2. Property Tax Reduction Pilot Program 8    (35 ILCS 200/18-249.10 new)9    Sec. 18-249.10. Property Tax Reduction Pilot Program. 10Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable years 112026 through 2031, the total property tax liability for any 12parcel of residential property in Bloom, Rich, Bremen, 13Thornton, or Calumet township for any of those taxable years 14shall be limited to the lesser of (i) the actual property tax 15liability for the property or (ii) $5,000.